West Virginia, session 2025, SB451.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. WEST VIRGINIA PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT ACT. §5-10-22o Enhanced benefit for certain annuitants. As an additional supplement to other retirement allowances provided, an enhanced retirement annuity of a retirant  who: (1) Is over the age of 77 years; (2) Retired before June 30, 2020; and (3) Has been receiving defined retirement benefits for at least 12 years, shall be an increased amount, payable monthly, equal to a compounded 103 percent of the retirant's  annual retirement payment  at the age of 65 years.